sk-SK: Typ stojana na gitaru: Podlahový stojan v tvare A; Stojan na kombo; Stolný stojan; Skladací cestovný stojan; Stojan na gitaru s opierkou/zámkom krku; Stojan na viacero gitár; Podlahový stojan s trojnožkou; Rúrkový podlahový stojan; Držiak na stenu (hák); Držiak na stenu (otočný); Iné
sv: Gitarrstativtyp: A-stativ för golv; Stativ för förstärkartopp; Skrivbords-/bordsstativ; Hopfällbart resestativ; Gitarrstativ med halsstöd/lås; Stativ för flera gitarrer; Trebent golvstativ; Rörformat golvstativ med klyka; Vägghängare (krok); Vägghållare (svängbar); Övrigt
pt-BR: Guitarra suporte tipo: Suporte de chão tipo A; Suporte de amplificador; Suporte de mesa; Suporte dobrável para viagem; Suporte para guitarra com trava/berço de braço; Rack para várias guitarras; Suporte de chão tipo tripé; Suporte de chão tubular tipo berço; Suporte de parede (gancho); Forquilha de parede (giratória); Outro
fi: Kitaratelineen tyyppi: A-mallinen lattiateline; Vahvistimen päälle asetettava teline; Pöytäteline; Taitettava matkateline; Kitarateline kaulatuella/-lukolla; Usean kitaran teline; Kolmijalkalattiateline; Putkirunkoinen lattiateline; Seinäteline (koukku); Seinähaarukka (kääntyvä); Muu
pt-PT: suporte para guitarra tipo: Suporte de chão em A; Suporte para topo de amplificador; Suporte de mesa; Suporte de viagem dobrável; Suporte de guitarra com apoio/bloqueio de braço; Suporte para várias guitarras; Suporte de chão tipo tripé; Suporte de chão em berço tubular; Suporte de parede (gancho); Suporte de parede (giratório); Outro
lt-LT: Gitaros stovo tipas: A formos pastatomas stovas; Stovas ant stiprintuvo; Stalinis stovas; Sulankstomas kelioninis stovas; Stovas su grifo laikikliu / užraktu; Kelių gitarų stovas; Trikojis pastatomas stovas; Vamzdinis pastatomas stovas; Sieninis laikiklis (kablys); Sieninis laikiklis (sukiojamas); Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta stojala za kitaro: Talno stojalo A-okvirja; Stojalo za na ojačevalec; Namizno stojalo; Zložljivo potovalno stojalo; Stojalo za kitaro z držalom/zaklepom za vrat; Stojalo za več kitar; Trinožno talno stojalo; Cevasto talno stojalo z naslonom; Stensko obešalo (kavelj); Stensko držalo (vrtljivo); Drugo
zh-TW: 吉他架類型: A 型落地立架; 音箱頂部立架; 桌面立架; 折疊式旅行立架; 附琴頸托架/鎖的吉他立架; 多把吉他架; 三腳落地立架; 管狀托架落地立架; 壁掛架 (掛鉤); 壁掛架 (可旋轉); 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta stalka za gitaru: Podni stalak A-okvira; Stalak na pojačalu; Stolni stalak; Sklopivi putni stalak; Stalak za gitaru s držačem/zaključavanjem vrata; Stalak za više gitara; Podni stalak na tronošcu; Cjevasti podni stalak; Zidni nosač (kuka); Zidni nosač (okretni); Ostalo
it: Tipo di supporto per chitarra: Supporto da terra ad A; Supporto da amplificatore; Supporto da scrivania/tavolo; Supporto pieghevole da viaggio; Supporto per chitarra con blocco/culla per manico; Rack multi-chitarra; Supporto da terra a treppiede; Supporto da terra tubolare a culla; Gancio da parete; Gancio da parete (girevole); Altro
de: Typ des Gitarrenständers: A-Rahmen-Bodenständer; Verstärker-Aufsatzständer; Schreibtisch-/Tischständer; Klappbarer Reiseständer; Gitarrenständer mit Halsauflage/-verriegelung; Mehrfach-Gitarrenständer; Stativ-Bodenständer; Rohrrahmen-Bodenständer; Wandhalterung (Haken); Wandhalterung (schwenkbar); Sonstige
vi: Loại giá đỡ đàn guitar: Giá để sàn hình chữ A; Giá đặt trên amply; Giá để bàn; Giá gấp gọn du lịch; Giá để guitar có khóa/đỡ cần đàn; Giá để nhiều guitar; Giá để sàn ba chân; Giá đỡ sàn dạng ống đỡ; Giá treo tường (móc); Ngàm treo tường (xoay); Khác
fr: Type de support de guitare: Support au sol en A; Support sur ampli; Support de bureau/table; Support de voyage pliant; Support pour guitare avec support/verrouillage du manche; Support pour plusieurs guitares; Support trépied au sol; Support au sol à berceau tubulaire; Support mural (crochet); Support mural (pivotant); Autre
nb: Gitarstativtype: A-ramme gulvstativ; Forsterkerstativ (topp); Skrivebords-/bordstativ; Sammenleggbart reisestativ; Gitarstativ med halsstøtte/lås; Gitarstativ for flere gitarer; Trebent gulvstativ; Rørstativ for gulv; Veggfeste (krok); Veggfeste (svingbart); Annet
ru: Тип стойки для гитары: Напольная А-образная стойка; Стойка на усилитель; Настольная стойка; Складная дорожная стойка; Стойка с фиксатором/держателем грифа; Рэковая стойка для нескольких гитар; Напольная стойка-тренога; Трубчатая напольная стойка; Настенный держатель (крюк); Настенный держатель (поворотный); Другое
nl: Gitaarstandaard type: A-frame vloerstandaard; Versterker-top-standaard; Bureau/tafelstandaard; Opvouwbare reisstandaard; Gitaarstandaard met halssteun/slot; Gitaarrek voor meerdere gitaren; Vloerstandaard met statief; Vloerstandaard met buissteun; Muurbeugel (haak); Muurbeugel (draaibaar); Overig
th: ขาตั้งกีตาร์แบบต่างๆ: ขาตั้งพื้นทรงเอ; ขาตั้งบนแอมป์; ขาตั้งโต๊ะ; ขาตั้งแบบพับได้สำหรับพกพา; ขาตั้งกีตาร์พร้อมที่รอง/ล็อกคอ; ชั้นวางกีตาร์หลายตัว; ขาตั้งพื้นแบบสามขา; ขาตั้งพื้นทรงท่อแบบเปลรอง; ที่แขวนผนัง (ตะขอ); แอกยึดผนัง (หมุนได้); อื่นๆ
ko: 기타 스탠드형: A 프레임 플로어 스탠드; 앰프 탑 스탠드; 데스크/테이블탑 스탠드; 접이식 여행용 스탠드; 넥 크래들/잠금장치가 있는 기타 스탠드; 다중 기타 랙; 삼각대 플로어 스탠드; 튜블러 크래들 플로어 스탠드; 벽걸이(후크); 벽걸이 요크(스위블); 기타
ro-RO: Tip stativ de chitară: Stativ de podea tip A; Stativ pentru amplificator; Stativ de birou/de masă; Stativ de călătorie pliabil; Stativ de chitară cu suport/blocare pentru gât; Raft pentru mai multe chitare; Stativ de podea tip trepied; Stativ de podea tubular; Suport de perete (cârlig); Suport de perete (pivotant); Altele
zh-CN: 吉他架类型: A 型落地架; 音箱顶部支架; 桌面支架; 折叠旅行支架; 带琴颈托架/锁的吉他架; 多吉他存放架; 三脚落地架; 管状托架落地架; 壁挂架（挂钩）; 壁挂托架（可旋转）; 其他
bg-BG: Тип стойка за китара: Подова стойка А-рамка; Стойка за усилвател; Настолна стойка; Сгъваема стойка за пътуване; Стойка за китара с опора/заключване за грифа; Стойка за няколко китари; Подова стойка тип статив; Тръбна подова стойка с опора; Стенна закачалка (кука); Стенна опора (въртяща се); Други
cs: Typ stojanu na kytaru: Podlahový stojan typu A; Stojan na kombo; Stolní stojan; Skládací cestovní stojan; Stojan na kytaru s opěrkou/zámkem krku; Stojan pro více kytar; Podlahový stojan typu trojnožka; Trubkový kolébkový podlahový stojan; Nástěnný věšák (hák); Nástěnný držák (otočný); Ostatní
hu: Gitárállvány típusa: A-keretes padlóállvány; Erősítőre tehető állvány; Asztali állvány; Összecsukható utazóállvány; Gitárállvány nyaktámasszal/zárral; Több gitáros tartó; Háromlábú padlóállvány; Csöves bölcsős padlóállvány; Fali gitártartó (kampó); Fali gitártartó (forgatható); Egyéb
el: Τύπος βάσης κιθάρας: Βάση δαπέδου τύπου Α; Βάση πάνω σε ενισχυτή; Βάση γραφείου/επιτραπέζια; Αναδιπλούμενη βάση ταξιδιού; Βάση κιθάρας με υποστήριξη/κλείδωμα μπράτσου; Βάση για πολλαπλές κιθάρες; Τριποδική βάση δαπέδου; Σωληνωτή βάση δαπέδου; Βάση τοίχου (γάντζος); Βάση τοίχου (περιστρεφόμενη); Άλλο
en: Guitar stand type: A-frame floor stand; Amp-top stand; Desk/tabletop stand; Folding travel stand; Guitar stand with neck cradle/lock; Multi-guitar rack; Tripod floor stand; Tubular cradle floor stand; Wall hanger (hook); Wall yoke (swivel); Other
ja: ギタースタンドタイプ: Aフレーム型フロアスタンド; アンプトップスタンド; デスク/卓上スタンド; 折りたたみ式トラベルスタンド; ネッククレードル/ロック付きギタースタンド; マルチギターラック; 三脚型フロアスタンド; パイプクレードル型フロアスタンド; 壁掛けハンガー (フック); 壁掛けヨーク (スイベル式); その他
da: Type af guitarstativ: Gulvstativ (A-ramme); Stativ til toppen af forstærker; Skrivebords-/bordstativ; Sammenklappeligt rejsestativ; Guitarstativ med halsstøtte/-lås; Stativ til flere guitarer; Trefodet gulvstativ; Gulvstativ med rørformet ramme; Vægbeslag (krog); Vægbeslag (drejeligt); Andet
tr: Gitar standı tipi: A tipi zemin standı; Amfi üstü stand; Masaüstü stand; Katlanabilir seyahat standı; Sap destekli/kilitli gitar standı; Çoklu gitar standı; Tripod zemin standı; Boru tipi destekli zemin standı; Duvar askısı (kanca); Duvar askısı (döner); Diğer
pl: Typ stojaka gitarowego: Statyw podłogowy w kształcie litery A; Statyw na wzmacniacz; Statyw biurkowy / stołowy; Składany statyw podróżny; Statyw gitarowy z uchwytem/blokadą gryfu; Stojak na wiele gitar; Trójnożny statyw podłogowy; Rurowy statyw podłogowy; Wieszak ścienny (hak); Wieszak ścienny (obrotowy uchwyt); Inne
es: Tipo de base para guitarra: Soporte de suelo en forma de A; Soporte para parte superior del amplificador; Soporte de escritorio/mesa; Soporte de viaje plegable; Soporte para guitarra con soporte/bloqueo de mástil; Soporte para múltiples guitarras; Soporte de suelo tipo trípode; Soporte de suelo de base tubular; Soporte de pared (gancho); Gancho de pared (giratorio); Otro